en: glucose-fructose
bg: глюкоза-фруктоза
de: Glukose-Fruktose
es: glucosa-fructosa
fi: glukoosi-fruktoosi
fr: glucose-fructose
hr: glukoza-fruktoza
it: Glucosio-fruttosio
nl: glucose-fructose
sv: Glukos-Fruktos

en: glucose-fructose syrup, fructose-glucose syrup, glucose and fructose syrup
bg: глюкозо-фруктозен сироп, сироп от глюкоза и фруктоза, фруктозо-глюкозен сироп
ca: Xarop de glucosa-fructosa, xarop de glicosa-fructosa, xarop de glucosa i fructosa
cs: glukózo-fruktózový sirup, glukózový-fruktózový sirup, glukózovo-fruktózový sirup, fruktózo-glukózový sirup
da: glukose-fruktosesirup, fruktose-glucosesirup
de: Glukose-Fruktose-Sirup, Glukose-Fruktosesirup, Glukose Fruktose sirup, Glucose-Fructose-Sirup, Fruktose-Glukose-Sirup
el: σιρόπι γλυκόζης-φρουκτόζης
es: jarabe de glucosa y fructosa, jarabe de glucosa-fructosa, sirope de glucosa y fructosa, sirope de glucosa-fructosa
et: glükoosi-fruktoosisiirup, glükoosifruktoosisiirup
fi: glukoosi-fruktoosisiirappi, glukoosi-fruktoosisiirappia, fruktoosi-glukoosisiirappi, glukoosi-fruktoosi-siirappi
fr: sirop de glucose-fructose, sirop de glucose et de fructose, sirop de fructose-glucose
hr: fruktozno-glukozni sirup, glukozno-fruktozni sirup, glukozno-fruktani sirup
hu: glükóz-fruktóz szirup, fruktóz-glükóz-szirup, glükóz-fruktózszirup, fruktóz-glükózszörp, glükóz-fruktózszörp, glükóz-fruktózszőrp
it: sciroppo di glucosio-fruttosio, sciroppo di fruttosio-glucosio
ja: 果糖ぶどう糖液糖
lt: gliukozės-fruktozės sirupas
lv: glikozes-fruktozes sīrups
nb: glukose-fruktosesirup
nl: glucose-fructosestroop, glucose-fructose-stroop, glucosefructosestroop
nn: glukos-fruktossirap
no: glukose-fruktosesirup, glukose-fruktose-sirup, glukose-fruktose sirup
pl: syrop glukozowo-fruktozowy, syrop fruktozowo-glukozowy
pt: xarope de glucose-frutose, xarope de glucose e frutose
ro: sirop de glucoză-fructoză, sirop glucoză-fructoză
ru: глюкозно-фруктозный сироп, сироп глюкозно-фруктозный, сироп глюкозно фруктозный
sk: glukózový-fruktózový sirup
sl: izoglukozni sirup
sr: glukozno-fruktozni sirup
sv: glukos-fruktossirap, glukosfruktossirap
uk: сироп глюкозно-фруктозний

en: wheat glucose-fructose syrup
bg: пшеничен глюкозо-фруктозен сироп
de: Glukose-und Fruktosesirup (Weizen)
fr: sirop de glucose-fructose de blé
hr: pšenični glukozno-fruktozni sirup
nl: glucose-fructosestroop van tarwe
pl: syrop glukozowo-fruktozowy z pszenicy, syrop fruktozowo-glukozowy z pszenicy

en: high fructose corn syrup, isoglucose, HCFS
bg: Високо-фруктозен сироп от царевица
ca: Xarop de blat de moro alt en fructosa
cs: izoglukózový sirup
de: Maissirup mit hohem Fruktosegehalt
el: σιρόπι ισογλυκόζης
es: Jarabe de maíz de alta fructosa, sirope de maíz de alta fructosa, JMAF
fi: isoglukoosi, maissitärkkelyssiirappi
fr: sirop de maïs à haute teneur en fructose, sirop de glucose-fructose de maïs, isoglucose, isoglucosamine, SGHF
hr: visokofruktozni kukuruzni sirup, izoglukozni sirup
hu: Izocukor
it: Sciroppo di mais ad alto contenuto di fruttosio
ja: 異性化糖, ぶどう糖果糖液糖, 異性化液糖
ko: 고과당 옥수수 시럽
nl: maïsglucose-fructosestroop
pl: Syrop kukurydziany o wysokiej zawartości fruktozy
sr: Високофруктозни кукурузни сируп
sv: Isoglukos
zh: 高果糖浆

en: invert sugar syrup, invert syrup, liquid invert syrup, inverted syrup
bg: сироп от инвертна захар, инвертен захарен сироп, инвертиран захарен сироп, инвертен сироп, сироп на инвертна захар
cs: sirup z invertního cukru
de: Invertzuckersirup
es: Jarabe de azúcar invertido, sirope de azúcar invertido
fi: inverttisokerisiirappi, inverttisokerisiirappia
fr: sirop de sucre inverti, sucre liquide inverti, sucre inverti en sirop
hr: invertni šećerni sirup, sirup invertnog šećera, sirup invertnoga šećera, invertni sirup
hu: invertcukor szirup, invertcukor-szirup, invertcukorszirup
it: sciroppo di zucchero invertito
lt: invertuotas curkaus sirupas, invertuotasis cukraus sirupas, invertuotas sirupas
lv: invertcukura sīrups
nl: invertsuikerstroop, invertsuikersiroop
pl: syrop cukru inwertowanego, syrop cukrowy inwertowany, syrop z inwertowanego cukru
pt: Xarope de açúcar invertido
ro: sirop de zahăr invertit, sirop de zahar invertit
ru: сироп инвертный
sv: invertsockersirap

en: golden syrup, partially inverted refiners syrup, treacle
de: Golden Syrup
fr: Mélasse blonde
hr: zlatni sirup
it: sciroppo d'oro
sv: gyllene sirap

en: light syrup
da: lys sirup
et: tume siirup, tume suhkrusiirup
fi: vaalea siirappi
lt: tamsusis sirupas
lv: tumšais sīrups, tumšais cukura sīrups
nb: lys sirup
sv: ljus sirap

en: dark syrup
da: mørk sirup
et: hele siirup, hele suhkrusiirup
fi: tumma siirappi
lt: auksaspalvis sirupas
lv: zeltainais sīrups, zeltainais cukura sīrups
nb: mørk sirup
ru: тёмньій сироп
sv: mörk sirap
uk: темный сироп

en: cane invert syrup, invert cane syrup
de: brauner Invertzuckersirup, Invertzuckersirup aus Rohrzucker
fi: Ruokoinverttisiirappi
fr: sirop de sucre de canne inverti, Sirop de canne invertie
hr: invertni sirup od trske
hu: invert nádcukorszirup
it: sciroppo di canna invertita

en: corevaporated cane syrup
fr: sirop de sucre de canne evaporé, sirop de canne évaporé
it: sciroppo di canna corevaporato

en: corn syrup
af: mieliestroop
ar: شراب الذرة
az: qarğıdalı siropu
be: Кукурузны сіроп
bg: царевичен сироп
bs: kukuruzni sirup
ca: Xarop de blat de moro
cs: Kukuřičný sirup
cy: Sîrop ŷd
da: majssirup
de: Maissirup
el: σιρόπι καλαμποκιού
eo: Maiza siropo
es: Jarabe de maíz, sirope de maíz
et: maisisiirup
fa: شربت ذرت
fi: maissisiirappi
fr: sirop de maïs
he: סירופ תירס
hr: kukuruzni sirup
hu: kukoricaszirup
id: sirup jagung
is: maíssíróp
it: sciroppo di mais
ja: コーンシロップ, コーンシラップ
ko: 옥수수 시럽
lt: kukurūzų sirupas
lv: kukurūzas sīrups
mk: пченкарен сируп
ms: sirap jagung
nl: Maïsstroop
nn: mais sirup
no: mais sirup
pl: Syrop kukurydziany
pt: xarope de milho
ro: sirop de porumb
ru: Кукурузный сироп
sk: kukuričný sirup
sl: koruzni sirup
sq: shurup misri
sr: кукурузни сируп
sv: majssirap
th: น้ำเชื่อมข้าวโพด
tr: Mısır şurubu
uk: Кукурудзяний сироп
uz: makkajo'xori siropi
vi: siro ngô
zh: 玉米糖漿

en: corn syrup solids
es: sólidos de jarabe de maíz, sólidos de sirope de maíz
fr: solides de sirop de maïs
hr: krutine kukuruznog sirupa
it: Sciroppo di mais disidratato

en: malted corn syrup
de: Maismalzsirup
fr: sirop de maïs malté
hr: kukuruzni sirup od slada
it: sciroppo di mais maltato
nl: maismoutstroop

en: starch syrup
fr: sirop d'amidon
hr: škrobni sirup
it: sciroppo di amido

en: corn starch syrup
fr: sirop d'amidon de maïs
it: sciroppo di amido di mais

en: high fructose starch syrup
fr: sirop d'amidon à haute teneur en fructose
hr: visoko fruktozni škrobni sirup
it: sciroppo di amido ad alto contenuto di fruttosio

en: maple syrup
bg: кленов сироп
da: ahornsirup
de: Ahornsirup
es: jarabe de arce, sirope de arce, savia de arce
fi: vaahterasiirappi
fr: sirop d’érable
hr: javorov sirup
hu: juharszirup
it: sciroppo d'acero
nl: esdoornsiroop, ahornsiroop
pl: syrop klonowy
ro: sirop de arţar
ru: кленовый сироп
sv: lönnsirap

en: canadian maple syrup
de: Kanadischer Ahornsirup
fi: kanadalainen vaahterasiirappi
fr: sirop d’érable canadien
hr: kanadski javorov sirup
hu: kanadai juharszirup
it: sciroppo d'acero canadese

en: pure maple syrup
da: ren ahornsirup
de: reiner Ahornsirup
es: Jarabe puro de arce, sirope puro de arce
fi: Puhdas vaahterasiirappi
fr: Sirop d'érable pur
hr: čisti javorov sirup
it: sciroppo d'acero puro

en: sugar syrup
bg: захарен сироп
ca: xarop de sucre
da: sukkersirup
de: Zuckersirup
es: Sirope de azucar, jarabe de azucar
fi: sokerisiirappi, sokeriliemi
fr: sirop de sucre
he: סירופ סוכר
hr: šećerni sirup
hu: cukorszirup
it: sciroppo di zucchero
lv: cukura sīrups
nb: sukkersirup, sukkerlake
nl: Suikerstroop
pl: Syrop cukrowy, syrop z cukru
pt: Xaropa de açúcar
ro: sirop de zahăr, sirop de zahar
ru: Сахарный сироп
sv: sockersirap
tr: şeker şurubu